test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-hides_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - hiđes: # 2B
    hiđes+N+Sg+Nom: hiđes
    hiđes+N+Sg+Gen: hittáás
    hiđes+N+Sg+Acc: hittáás
    hiđes+N+Sg+Ill: hitásân
    hiđes+N+Sg+Loc: hitásist
    hiđes+N+Sg+Com: hitásáin
    hiđes+N+Sg+Abe: hittáásttáá
    hiđes+N+Ess: hiđesin                #hitásin
    hiđes+N+Par: hiđesid                #hitásid
    hiđes+N+Pl+Nom: hitáseh
    hiđes+N+Pl+Gen: hitásij
    hiđes+N+Pl+Acc: hitásijd
    hiđes+N+Pl+Ill: hitásáid
    hiđes+N+Pl+Loc: hitásijn
    hiđes+N+Pl+Com: hitásijguin
    hiđes+N+Pl+Abe: hitásijttáá
